West Virginia, session 2026, HB4075.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 15. ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-15-4y. Biodentical hormones to be covered by all health insurance policies. Any insurer who, on or after January 1, 2026, delivers or issues a policy of group accident and sickness insurance in this state under the provisions of this article shall make available as benefits to all subscribers and members coverage on an expense-incurred basis and individual and group service or indemnity type contracts issued by a nonprofit corporation shall provide coverage for biodentical hormones when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a licensed physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient's symptoms, diagnostic test results, or response to treatment. ARTICLE 16. GROUP ACCIDENT AND SICKNESS INSURANCE. §33-16-3ii. Biodentical hormones to be covered by all health insurance policies. Any insurer who, on or after January 1, 2026, delivers or issues a policy of group accident and sickness insurance in this state under the provisions of this article shall make available as benefits to all subscribers and members coverage on an expense-incurred basis and individual and group service or indemnity type contracts issued by a nonprofit corporation shall provide coverage for biodentical hormones when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a licensed physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient's symptoms, diagnostic test results, or response to treatment. ARTICLE 24. HOSPITAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS, MEDICAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS, DENTAL SERVICE CORPORATIONS AND HEALTH SERVICE CORPORATIONS. §33-24-7z. Biodentical hormones to be covered by all health insurance policies. A policy, provision, contract, plan, or agreement subject to this article, on or after January 1, 2026, shall provide coverage for biodentical hormones when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a licensed physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient's symptoms, diagnostic test results, or response to treatment. ARTICLE 25. HEALTH CARE CORPORATIONS. §33-25-8w. Biodentical hormones to be covered by all health insurance policies. Any health care corporation that, on or after January 1, 2026, delivers or issues a policy of sickness or health insurance in this state under the provisions of this article shall provide coverage for biodentical hormones when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a licensed physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient's symptoms, diagnostic test results, or response to treatment. ARTICLE 25A. HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATION ACT. §33-25A-8z. Biodentical hormones to be covered by all health insurance policies. A health maintenance organization issuing coverage in this state pursuant to the provisions of this article shall provide coverage for biodentical hormones when determined to be medically necessary and ordered by a licensed physician after making a thorough evaluation of the patient's symptoms, diagnostic test results, or response to treatment.